Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.111

Exemption from public disclosure—Records subject to public disclosure, when.

All pleadings, papers, evidence records, and files of the commission, including complaints and the identity of complainants, compiled or obtained during the course of an investigation or initial proceeding involving the discipline or retirement of a judge or justice, are exempt from the public disclosure requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW during such investigation or initial proceeding. As of the date of a public hearing, all those records of the initial proceeding that were the basis of a finding of probable cause are subject to the public disclosure requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 201; 1989 c 367 s 6.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.